New York, session 2025-2026, S754.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 1 and 2 of section 402 of the transportation 2 law, as amended by a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the transpor- 3 tation law relating to the membership of the Republic airport commis- 4 sion, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 9475 and A. 10336, are 5 amended to read as follows: 6 1. Upon assumption by the department of transportation of jurisdiction 7 over the airport facility and surrounding area located in the county of 8 Suffolk, known as Republic airport, there shall thereupon be created a 9 Republic airport commission. This commission will be an advisory coun- 10 cil to the commissioner with respect to administration and management of 11 the Republic airport facilities and its surrounding areas with respect 12 to projects to be undertaken and operations and management of the facil- 13 ities at such airport. The commission shall be composed of nine members 14 who are residents of Nassau county or Suffolk county, one of whom shall 15 be appointed by the governor without recommendation from any other 16 person, four of whom shall be appointed by the governor upon the recom- 17 mendation of the temporary president of the senate, and four of whom 18 shall be appointed by the governor upon the recommendation of the speak- 19 er of the assembly. For each appointment upon a recommendation, the 20 recommender shall submit a list of no fewer than three persons, from 21 which the governor shall appoint one. All such members shall be 22 appointed for a term of four years, except in the case that a vacancy 23 occurs and is filled before the expiration of a member's term, the 24 member appointed to fill such vacancy shall be appointed to the remain- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02829-01-5 S. 754 2 1 der of such term. By virtue of such commissioner's office, the commis- 2 sioner of transportation or the commissioner's designee shall be an ex 3 officio member of the commission. All such members shall be deemed 4 officers of the state in connection with the provisions of section 5 seventeen of the public officers law. The members of the commission 6 shall appoint a chair from among their number. Members shall not receive 7 a salary or other compensation, but shall be reimbursed for their actual 8 and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official 9 duties. 10 2. The Republic airport commission shall assist in the development of 11 a program relative to the administration and management of the Republic 12 airport and to advise the commissioner of transportation with regard to 13 such other programs relative to the Republic airport as [he] the commis- 14 sioner may undertake. Such program shall include, but not be limited to 15 identification of future capital needs, examining the means and methods 16 of financing such future capital needs, the promotion and examination of 17 the financing means and methods for the economic development of the area 18 around the airport, the joining together of such economic development 19 and the airport operations, the identification and implementation of 20 ways of working with the local community to accomplish the program and 21 the identification of non-aviation uses and purposes and prorations of 22 use or purposes for determinations of in lieu of tax payments. Once the 23 commission has been established, the commissioner and/or the department 24 shall effectuate the authorizations, powers and/or duties set forth in 25 section four hundred of this article only following the consultation, 26 guidance, advice and assistance of the commission. The Republic airport 27 commission shall meet at least six times a year at the call of the 28 commissioner of transportation or the chair of the commission and shall 29 keep a record of all its proceedings and recommendations. Staff services 30 for the commission shall be performed by personnel of the department of 31 transportation. In carrying out the functions and responsibilities of 32 the commissioner and the commission, the commissioner shall designate an 33 executive secretary from among the staff of the department of transpor- 34 tation who will act as the administrative agent of the commission and 35 assist the commission in fulfilling its duties and functions. 36 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 37 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the transportation law 38 relating to the membership of the Republic airport commission, as 39 proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 9475 and A. 10336, takes 40 effect.